Hawaii, session 2025, SB660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  The Hawaii state energy office shall conduct a study to identify the most cost-effective investments for clean energy alternatives to combustible fuels.  The study shall include an analysis of the different energy consumption sectors to determine which may be most quickly and cost-effectively decarbonized through additional public investments in combustion-free alternatives. (b)  The Hawaii state energy office shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________